Connecticut, session 2026, SB00241.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) For the purposes described in
subsection (b) of this section, the State Bond Commission shall have the
power from time to time to authorize the issuance of bonds of the state
in one or more series and in principal amounts not exceeding in the
aggregate five million dollars.
(b) The proceeds of the sale of such bonds, to the extent of the amount
stated in subsection (a) of this section, shall be used by the Department
of Economic and Community Development for the purpose of
providing a grant-in-aid to the Waterbury Land Bank Authority to
acquire, maintain, remediate or develop real property and for related
projects in the city of Waterbury.
(c) All provisions of section 3-20 of the general statutes, or the exercise
of any right or power granted thereby, that are not inconsistent with the
provisions of this section are hereby adopted and shall apply to all
bonds authorized by the State Bond Commission pursuant to this
LCO 1241 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 241
section. Temporary notes in anticipation of the money to be derived
from the sale of any such bonds so authorized may be issued in
accordance with section 3-20 of the general statutes and from time to
time renewed. Such bonds shall mature at such time or times not
exceeding twenty years from their respective dates as may be provided
in or pursuant to the resolution or resolutions of the State Bond
Commission authorizing such bonds. None of such bonds shall be
authorized except upon a finding by the State Bond Commission that
there has been filed with it a request for such authorization that is signed
by or on behalf of the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
and states such terms and conditions as said commission, in its
discretion, may require. Such bonds issued pursuant to this section shall
be general obligations of the state and the full faith and credit of the state
of Connecticut are pledged for the payment of the principal of and
interest on such bonds as the same become due, and accordingly and as
part of the contract of the state with the holders of such bonds,
appropriation of all amounts necessary for punctual payment of such
principal and interest is hereby made, and the State Treasurer shall pay
such principal and interest as the same become due.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
CE Joint Favorable C/R FIN
LCO 1241 2 of 2